src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
SFX c Y 25
SFX c  0   ies    [â]t    #relf.nenoteiksme
SFX c  ât  os     [â]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ât  ies    [â]t    #tag, IIp
SFX c  t   mies   [â]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ât  ieties [â]t    #pavçle
SFX c  ât  oties  [â]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   ğoties [â]t    #atst.izst.v.nak
SFX c  0   ies    [ç]t    #relf.nenoteiksme ----------
SFX c  çt  os     [ç]t    #tag, Ip 
SFX c  çt  ies    [ç]t    #tag, IIp
SFX c  çt  as     [ç]t    #tag, IIIp
SFX c  çt  amies  [ç]t    #tag, Ip.d.
SFX c  çt  aties  [ç]t    #tag, IIp.d
SFX c  çt  ieties [ç]t    #pavçle
SFX c  çt  oties  [ç]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   ğoties [ç]t    #atst.izst.v.nak ------
SFX c  0   ies    [î]t    #relf.nenoteiksme
SFX c  ît  os     [î]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ît  ies    [î]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ît  âs     [î]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ît  âmies  [î]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ît  âties  [î]t    #tag, Ip
SFX c  ît  ieties [î]t    #
SFX c  ît  oties  [î]t    #atst.izst.v.tag
SFX c  t   ğoties [î]t    #atst.izst.v.nak
#SFX c  0   os     [â]t    #cieshamaa k.
#SFX c  0   os     [ç]t    #cieshamaa k.
#SFX c  0   os     [î]t    #cieshamaa k.

SFX 6 Y 104
SFX 6   t     ju      [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     0       [bmp]t
SFX 6   t     j       [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jam     [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jat     [âçubmp]t
SFX 6   t     jot     [âçubmp]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     jiet    [âçu]t    #pavçle
SFX 6   t     iet    [bmp]t    #pavçle
SFX 6   t     j       [âçu]t
SFX 6   gt    dzu     [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dz      [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzam    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzat    [g]t
SFX 6   gt    dzot    [g]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   gt    dziet   [g]t
SFX 6   kt    cu      [k]t
SFX 6   kt    c       [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cam     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cat     [k]t
SFX 6   kt    cot     [k]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   kt    ciet    [k]t
SFX 6   ût    uju     [û]t
SFX 6   ût    uj      [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujam    [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujat    [û]t
SFX 6   ût    ujot    [û]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   ût    ujiet   [û]t
SFX 6   zt    şu      [z]t
SFX 6   t     0       [z]t
SFX 6   zt    ş       [z]t
SFX 6   zt    şam     [z]t
SFX 6   zt    şat     [z]t
SFX 6   zt    şot     [z]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     iet     [lz]t
SFX 6   lt    ïu      [l]t
SFX 6   t     0       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ï       [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïam     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïat     [l]t
SFX 6   lt    ïot     [l]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   t     u       [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     0       [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     am      [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     at      [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     iet     [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   t     ot     [^âç][r]t
SFX 6   ârt   aru     [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   ar      [â]rt  # â ç speciâlie
SFX 6   ârt   aram    [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   arat    [â]rt
SFX 6   ârt   arot    [â]rt    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   ârt   ariet   [â]rt
SFX 6   çrt   eru     [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   er      [ç]rt  # â ç speciâlie
SFX 6   çrt   eram    [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   erat    [ç]rt
SFX 6   çrt   erot    [ç]rt    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 6   çrt   eriet   [ç]rt
SFX 6  zt   şoğs     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğa     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğam    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğu     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğâ     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğas    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğai    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoği     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğiem   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğus    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğos    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğâm    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğâs    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğais   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajam  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğo     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajâ   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajai  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğie    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajiem [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajos  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajâm  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şoğajâs  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şams     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şama     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamam    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamu     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamâ     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamas    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamai    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şami     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamiem   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamus    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamos    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamâm    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamâs    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamais   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajam  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamo     [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajâ   [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajai  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamie    [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajiem [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajos  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajâm  [z]t
SFX 6  zt   şamajâs  [z]t

SFX 2 Y 7
SFX 2   st     şu     [s]t   # tagadne
SFX 2   st     d      [s]t
SFX 2   st     ş      [s]t
SFX 2   st     şam    [s]t
SFX 2   st     şat    [s]t
SFX 2   st     şot    [s]t    #atst.izt.v.tag
SFX 2   st     diet   [s]t

SFX 3 Y 6
SFX 3   st     ğu     [s]t
SFX 3   t      0      [s]t
SFX 3   st     ğ      [s]t
SFX 3   st     ğam    [s]t
SFX 3   st     ğat    [s]t
SFX 3   st     ğot    [s]t    #atst.izt.v.tag

SFX 7 Y 12
SFX 7   t   stu   [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   sti   [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   st    [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stam  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stat  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stot  [^sz]t
SFX 7   t   stiet [^sz]t
SFX 7   0   i    [sz]t
SFX 7   0   am   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   at   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   ot   [sz]t
SFX 7   0   iet  [sz]t

SFX M Y 4
SFX M   t    dams    t
SFX M   t    dama    t
SFX M   t    dami    t
SFX M   t    damas   t

SFX N Y 4
SFX N   st   zdams   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdama   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdami   [s]t
SFX N   st   zdamas  [s]t

#modificçts 2006.04.06
SFX [ Y 5
SFX [   t    damies    t
SFX [   t    damâs     t
SFX [   t    ğanos     [^sz]t
SFX [   st   ğanos     [s]t
SFX [   zt   ğanos     [z]t


SFX ] Y 2
SFX ]   st   zdamies [s]t
SFX ]   st   zdamâs  [s]t

SFX { Y 3
SFX { t  juğies    t
SFX { t  jusies    t
SFX { t  joğies    t
#SFX { t  jies      t

#2006-08-06 - pievienots sfx -oğies (III konj, piem.)
SFX } Y 3
SFX } t  uğies    t
SFX } t  usies    t
SFX } t  oğies    t
#SFX } t  ies      t

SFX Z Y 23
SFX Z   t   stams     t
SFX Z   t   stama     t
SFX Z   t   stamam    t
SFX Z   t   stamu     t
SFX Z   t   stamâ     t
SFX Z   t   stamas    t
SFX Z   t   stamai    t
SFX Z   t   stami     t
SFX Z   t   stamiem   t
SFX Z   t   stamus    t
SFX Z   t   stamos    t
SFX Z   t   stamâm    t
SFX Z   t   stamâs    t
SFX Z   t   stamais   t
SFX Z   t   stamajam  t
SFX Z   t   stamo     t
SFX Z   t   stamajâ   t
SFX Z   t   stamajai  t
SFX Z   t   stamie    t
SFX Z   t   stamajiem t
SFX Z   t   stamajos  t
SFX Z   t   stamajâm  t
SFX Z   t   stamajâs  t

SFX )   Y 23
SFX )   t   jams     t
SFX )   t   jama     t
SFX )   t   jamam    t
SFX )   t   jamu     t
SFX )   t   jamâ     t
SFX )   t   jamas    t
SFX )   t   jamai    t
SFX )   t   jami     t
SFX )   t   jamiem   t
SFX )   t   jamus    t
SFX )   t   jamos    t
SFX )   t   jamâm    t
SFX )   t   jamâs    t
SFX )   t   jamais   t
SFX )   t   jamajam  t
SFX )   t   jamo     t
SFX )   t   jamajâ   t
SFX )   t   jamajai  t
SFX )   t   jamie    t
SFX )   t   jamajiem t
SFX )   t   jamajos  t
SFX )   t   jamajâm  t
SFX )   t   jamajâs  t
