src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizirt/+(IdeBh[J}56M
aiznērst/+eIF34M
aizost/+EI2N
aizplest/+BIdN
aizpļāpāt/+MIgbG$)d[{J
aizspraust/E+2IN]
aizsvilināt/JbC+ch(BIgdM1
aizsēt/+$bB6)J1I{M
aiztupt/+ZI^Je4B7}Md[
aizvirpot/+)IbJBM$gG1dH
aizziest/+INE2
aizķeksēt/)HGgbBI[J+$dM1
apart/+[BI6e(h}M4J
apaust/+EI]N2
apbirzt/+Ie7B4
apdzēst/+Ie3MF4
apercipēt/+1IBM)b{dgJ[$HG
apkalt/e+I7BZ4^J6}[M
apknibināt/+cJIh[bg1(MdBC
apkraut/)+$BI6Jd[5M
aplaist/+ENq2]
aplamāt/M+bIdJB[1G)$gH{
aplēst/3+MIFe45
apmērot/b+)H$JBIM1
applest/+INBd]
appūst/3+BIN
appūt/BI+a^7JZ4M
apraudāt/+gJBdIhb[1M
apspraust/+I2EN
apsprāgt/Z7^+aIBMJ4
aptupt/^+eZ4BdI7[MJ
apvalkāt/$g+)GJ{[MbIHBd1
apzilēt/+)IdMJbB$gH1G[
apzviegt/+%aIBJM[65
apģist/+EINJ]
apšķiest/I]E+2N
atbradāt/+b1IMB)H$J
atdrāzt/d6Ie+B}M4[
atdusēt/+g(MbIcdBJh1C[
atelst/e+}MI3[F4
atglaudīt/c+bd(g[hJMI1
atglaust/+IEN2
atkurkt/+7BI^%6ZM5J
atlīkt/+Z^7BIa4JM
atmērcēt/b+M)[J$B{Ig1HGd
atmērkt/J+M
atplūst/%E+IJ7N
atrast/+IJE]N
atslābt/JeM+IZB4^7
atspiest/+]EI2N
atsērst/e3+FIM4
attransportēt/+IBg)[$JGdbMH1
attīstīt/+bdgIJMc(B[1C
atvasināt/+(MgbIdchB[JC1
atķērkt/ZJ+^M%I67Ba5
atļumt/+^eZ(JIh7BM84
augt/+JIdB4aM}h[8(
aust/+E%FMJ2eI7N]4
autorizēt/+${GMbJ1gIBd)[H
beigt/%+IdaB[5M6J
berzēt/+I$Hd)gJ[GMbB1{
darvot/d+$J)Gb[gI{HBM1
dimdēt/+cJ(BIhC1[bgdM
drasēt/+$b)IJ[B1HM
driskāt/d+gIJB1)G{b$[MH
drāzt/+e6BId[}M4
dārdēt/J[+gbhcdIB(CM1
elst/+IeF3[M}4
flirtēt/+$I{b[JGM1B)dgH
gāgāt/+{BIG1g$)db[HJM
ieairēt/J)$+dgI{bGBMH[1
ieaust/EI+N2]
iebojāt/+$b{GJ[BI)g1dHM
iecept/he}I4B(+[dJ8M
ieformēt/[$J+)bdIBG1gMH
iegulgt/JBI5+6%aM
iegult/h+^eI7BZ5dM[J
iekalt/+^ZIeBMJ}7[64
iekost/+EIN2]
iekurkt/+^%7BIZ[56JdM
iekāst/3+eIFM4
ielādēt/+(dB$HbIcg)h[JCMG1
iepresēt/+bIHMG$B)d1Jg[
iepukstēt/+b1BIc[gJdMC
iepūst/3IBN+
ierūgt/+Z^7JIB4aM
iesijāt/b+$HGgIB[Jd)1{M
ieskaust/2+0N
iesnaust/+]N
iespraust/2N+EI]
iespurgt/+%dIaB5[M6J
iestīvēt/+J[b$)dIGBgM1H
iesviest/+EIN]2
ietupt/^e+Z[I7BdJM4
ieviest/F+eI3M[}4
ievirt/Ze+I7BM^4J
ievīstīt/+bgIJc(B1[MdC
individualizēt/J$[d)+bG{IBHgM1
instalēt/$I+bg)Bd1HGM[{J
izaust/+NE2I]
izburt/+(IdJB5Mh6
izdegt/+dBI(8Jh}aM4[
izelst/F+eI34M
izfilozofēt/HgbG+)IB[d$MJ1
izjust/+JIBNd]
izkurkt/ZM+7BI6%^J5
izkurtēt/gH$)b+IJ[GMdB1
izlaist/E]+2N
izlecināt/+hCcgdJ[Ib(1BM
izlīmēt/$H+BIgbG)d[M{1J
izlīt/BI+^7ZMJ
izmalt/MI4B6+e}d[J
izmirgot/M)+JIb1BG$H
izpaust/+2EI]N
izpūst/3IB+N]
izsaldēt/+)MJbdgH$IGB[1
izskūt/BI+46aMJ
izslīgt/+ZI7^BJa4M
izspiest/EI+]2N
izspraust/+E2NI]
izstigot/+[b)I$GB1dMHJ
izturēt/+(dbhIMc[gBJ1C
izvējot/+MgJIb$B)dGH1
izēst/I]E+JN
izžulgt/Z+IaB7J4M^
klakšķēt/+dbJ[BI1ch(CgM
kniest/e}+FI[3M4
knist/+IJBN
kompilēt/)$G+b[{Ig1dBHMJ
konsultēt/IB+)MGb${gJdH[1
kopt/e+$)IJM[6Bd4
kurkt/+M%5BJ^67IZ
kāst/I+}F[eM34
laizīt/+IcJh[b(dMBCg1
mašinizēt/g+$[dI)BJGHbM1{
mehanizēt/{+d1IBbJ$)gHMG[
miecēt/+J$1BI){gbGHMd[
noasarot/bJ+)I$B1GHM
noaugt/J(+dB4Ia[hM}8
nobrist/E+I]JN
nodvest/+Ie3F4M
noglaust/I+E]N2
nojēgt/JIa%B5+[6M
nokarst/+J%I7F4eM
nokaunināt/J+bhcBI1(gCd[M
noklabināt/+h(bJIgBcC1Md
noknist/IJB+N
nokonvertēt/)+I$Bd1gbHG[MJ
nokāst/3+eI}F[M4
nomelst/I+eM3F4
nonitrēt/+b$I1g)d[JBMGH
normalizēt/+[IdMgHbGBJ$)1{
nosarkt/+JMaI7BZ^4
nosegt/+%daJ[BI6M5
noskrāpēt/g1+IBbd[M)GJH$
noslāpt/+Je^ZI7MB4
nosnaust/+2EIN]
nospodrināt/+J(bI1gdBhc[MC
nospriest/2E+IN
nosūkt/5I%B+[ad6MJ
nozīst/2E]+IN
nošķīdināt/+IbhdMJ(B1cg[C
paaijāt/+$b)1IBJHM
pabadīt/Bd+(h[bIJCc4g1M
pabalēt/[J+b$)IgBHGd1M
pabozt/+6I4BdM[}e
pabrist/]+EJNI
pagrimt/BM+Z^eIJ74
pagulgt/BI5%+aMJ6
pairt/^Z+h[edI}6(JB75M4
pakniest/+eIFM43
pakūpēt/Mb+BI1hJ(C
pamainīt/b+hIc(1BC[gMdJ
pamērcēt/b+)G{$g[JdBI1HM
paplest/Bd+IN]
papīkt/+Ia^ZB47MJ
papūst/3+IBNd]
parotāt/M+GI{bd)g$BJ[1H
paspiegot/+b)$JI1MBdHG[
paspiest/+I2E]N
paspēt/)+I$b1BJ6M
pastīvināt/+bh[dMJIB(Ccg1
pasvilt/eJ+7BI^dZ4[M
patecināt/+BIdhbMcC(J[g1
pavelcēt/J[M$+)BdIb1GgH
paēst/+I]EJN
pačiept/+Z7^B4Ie6)J$M
pieaugt/J+}Bdh(aI[8M4
piecirst/N+BdI]J
piedurt/+(I[Jh6dB5M
pieelst/F+Ie3M4
piekurināt/(1IB+JcCh[bdgM
pielaist/]+NE2
piepaist/F%+Ie47
pierimt/+e7BId4^JZ[M
pieslaucīt/1BI(+gbd[MJ
piesnaust/+EI2N
piespert/+JhdBI5([M6
piesprūst/%+NEIJ7
piespīgot/G)bIB1+H$JM
pietēst/+FIeM43
pievienot/+b)$dJg1IBGHM
piezīst/+]IEN2
plaisāt/+g[MdBJI1Gb{)$H
pretstatīt/I(1g+h[BdMbJcC
pāraugt/JM+(adIB4h8}[
pāraust/E2+I]N
pārblīst/%+IE7NJ
pārbērt/+%MeBI[J64
pārkrist/+dBJIN]
pārkļūt/+I7BZ^aMJ4
pārlutināt/I1g(h+bCBdc[MJ
pārplēst/Ie+F3M4
pārprast/+hIdJNB]4F
pārpūdēt/$[)M+GbBIdHg1J
pārpūlēt/$Bd[)I+GbcgHJ1{M
pārpūžņot/b+)$IJBHMG1
pārrūdīt/Ib1g(+hdBMCcJ[
pārslīgt/a+I7BMZ^J4
pārspēt/+$b6)MJIB1
pārsviest/+I]E2N
pārēst/+NIEJ]
rumulēt/+)HIb[$M1BgGJd{
rūgt/7BI+^4aZJM
sabadīt/M+(bIhBCJd[cg1
sabrāzt/+d}[M
sabuknīt/+$bHgGIB{)d1M[J
sabērt/+BeI%6[J4M
sainvestēt/+IB$)bJ1HM
sajust/+NIJB]d
sakalt/+e^IBJZ46}7M[
sakonfigurēt/+$BbI)1HJ[M
sakāst/3+}Ie[F4M
salaist/+E2]N
samēzt/6+}eBIM4[
sarast/E+IJN]
sasarkt/M+aIJ^BZ74
sasilt/+^Ie7BJZ4M
saskart/+BdI(6hMJ[5
saspriest/+EI]2N
sasprādzēt/b$+dGJgBIM)H[1
satvarstīt/+J[Mh(cbIgdB1C
savēst/3+eJF4IBM
sašķērst/N]+
sažilbt/B+e^ZJM4I7
sirgt/+^IaB7ZJM4
skābēt/$+I)dMJH[gbB{1G
slapēt/)+I{BdbgHG$1J[M
smidzināt/+dB[JhbM(1IcCg
spriest/+INE2]
tikšķēt/C+c(h1gIB[dbJM
tveicēt/)$b+gH{GJMIB[1d
uzbozt/6+dBM[I}e4
uzgult/+^eI7BMJZ5d[
uzjumt/+IeB6$4)JM
uzkrakšķināt/+h(MIg1BdbCJ[c
uzpampt/+4BIeZ^J7M
uzrast/+IEN]J
uzspraust/E+I2]N
uzstūrēt/I$+J1BbH)M
uzsvaidīt/b+Ih(cB[Jg1dMC
uzvest/+INJE]
uzvāzt/6+eI}[B4M
uzžulgt/Z+aIB7^4
viest/+IFe3M[4}
vulkanizēt/M+dGJ[b${gHBI)1
vējot/+J)b{G$IBdg[HM1
ņurcīt/IB1gJb[+cdMC
